Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB702.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "claimant" in section 1303 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, is amended to read:Section 1303. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Claimant." A person who files a claim for property tax 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 rebate or rent rebate in lieu of property taxes and:(1) was at least 65 years of age or whose spouse, if a member of the household, was at least 65 years of age during a calendar year in which real property taxes or rent were due and payable;(2) was a widow or widower [and was at least 50 years of age] during a calendar year or part thereof in which real property taxes or rent were due and payable; or(3) was a permanently disabled person 18 years of age or older during a calendar year or part thereof in which the real property taxes or rent were due and payable.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0702PN0722 - 2 - 12345678910111213